Florida, session 2026, SB1478.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âParagraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (19) of 26 section 1001.03, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 27 1001.03âSpecific powers of State Board of Education.â 28 (19)âINTELLECTUAL FREEDOM AND VIEWPOINT DIVERSITY 29 ASSESSMENT.â 30 (a)âFor the purposes of this subsection, the term: 31 1.ââIntellectual freedom and viewpoint diversityâ means the 32 exposure of students, faculty, and staff to, and the 33 encouragement of their exploration of, a variety of ideological 34 and political perspectives. 35 2.ââShieldâ means to limit studentsâ, faculty membersâ, or 36 staff membersâ access to, or observation of, ideas and opinions 37 that they may find uncomfortable, unwelcome, disagreeable, or 38 offensive. 39 (c)âThe State Board of Education shall ensure that may not 40 shield students, faculty, or staff at Florida College System 41 institutions are free from undue political influence and 42 interference in academic affairs, including curriculum design, 43 faculty appointments, research activities, and administrative 44 operations free speech protected under the First Amendment to 45 the United States Constitution, Art. I of the State 46 Constitution, or s. 1004.097. 47 Section 2.âParagraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (13) of 48 section 1001.706, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 49 1001.706âPowers and duties of the Board of Governors.â 50 (13)âINTELLECTUAL FREEDOM AND VIEWPOINT DIVERSITY 51 ASSESSMENT.â 52 (a)âFor the purposes of this subsection, the term: 53 1.ââIntellectual freedom and viewpoint diversityâ means the 54 exposure of students, faculty, and staff to, and the 55 encouragement of their exploration of, a variety of ideological 56 and political perspectives. 57 2.ââShieldâ means to limit studentsâ, faculty membersâ, or 58 staff membersâ access to, or observation of, ideas and opinions 59 that they may find uncomfortable, unwelcome, disagreeable, or 60 offensive. 61 (c)âThe Board of Governors shall ensure that may not shield 62 students, faculty, or staff at state universities are free from 63 undue political influence and interference in academic affairs, 64 including curriculum design, faculty appointments, research 65 activities, and administrative operations free speech protected 66 under the First Amendment to the United States Constitution, 67 Art. I of the State Constitution, or s. 1004.97. 68 Section 3.âSection 1004.022, Florida Statutes, is created 69 to read: 70 1004.022âAcademic freedom.âNotwithstanding any other law to 71 the contrary: 72 (1)âEvery student in the State University System and 73 Florida College System has the unalienable right to pursue 74 education access across all academic disciplines without 75 governmental or institutional interference, including, but not 76 limited to, a studentâs prerogative to select, drop, or change 77 courses and areas of study without facing pressure or 78 restrictions based on political or ideological grounds. 79 (2)âFaculty members in the State University System and 80 Florida College System are entitled to full academic freedom in 81 their teaching, research, scholarship, and creative activity. 82 This includes the right to do all of the following: 83 (a)âInvestigate, discover, create, and disseminate 84 knowledge without undue interference or restriction from 85 political, ideological, or institutional forces. 86 (b)âDetermine the content of their courses, methods of 87 instruction, and subject matter consistent with professional 88 standards and the mission of the institution. 89 (c)âEngage in extramural speech and professional discourse 90 without institutional discipline or reprisal, provided such 91 expression is consistent with their responsibilities as scholars 92 and educators. Academic freedom for faculty shall be exercised 93 in a manner consistent with the standards of the academic 94 profession, institutional policies of shared governance, and the 95 principles articulated by the American Association of University 96 Professors. 97 Section 4.âSubsection (7) of section 1004.421, Florida 98 Statutes, is amended to read: 99 1004.421âElection Law Center at the Florida State 100 University.âThe Florida State University Election Law Center is 101 hereby created at the Florida State University College of Law. 102 (7)âThe centerâs research, work, activities, filings, 103 speakers, events, and operations shall be subject to academic 104 freedom protections. The center or any of its full-time faculty 105 or staff may not be compelled to conduct, consult on, or 106 otherwise assist any research or initiatives by any outside 107 federal, state, or local official or agency or private person or 108 entity. The center shall seek to promote intellectual freedom 109 and viewpoint diversity as defined in s. 1001.706(13)(a). s. 110 1001.706(13)(a)1. 111 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.